Louisiana, session 2026, HB44.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:2586(C)(9) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2586. Jurisdiction and procedure
* * *
C.
* * *
(9) A justice of the peace court in St. Bernard Parish shall have concurrent
jurisdiction over property standards and nuisance violations anywhere in the parish
in which the court is situated, pursuant to local ordinance. In addition, a constable
of a justice of the peace court in St. Bernard Parish may issue summons and serve
subpoenas for such violations occurring anywhere within the territorial jurisdiction
of the justice of the peace court.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.